Utah statutes.
63G-5-301.   Effect on other laws.
Nothing in this chapter or in the agreements and procedures developed in
Section 63G-5-201 shall:
(1)  limit other dispute resolution procedures available to an agency; and
(2)  deny a person a right granted under federal or other state law, including
a right to an administrative or judicial hearing.
